Utah statutes.
77-10a-11.   Jury foreman -- Compensation of grand jurors.

(1)  The managing judge shall appoint one of the jurors to be foreman and another to be deputy foreman.  The foreman may administer oaths and affirmations and shall sign all indictments.  The foreman or another juror designated by him shall keep record of the number of jurors concurring in the finding of every indictment and shall file the record with the clerk of the court.  The record may not be made public except on order of the managing judge.

(2)  During the absence of the foreman the deputy foreman shall act as foreman.

(3)  A grand juror shall be compensated at the same rate as a juror in a state district court for each day of service.

